Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 3. Charter Schools
§ 21-3-307.
Charter application; contents; phased-in application process.

The charter school application shall be on a form prescribed by the state superintendent pursuant to subsection (d) of this section, and shall include:

A description of the educational program of the school, designed to identify those whom the school is attempting to educate, what it means to be an educated person in the twenty-first century and how learning best occurs. The goals identified in that program shall include the objective of enabling pupils to become self-motivated, competent and lifelong learners;

The measurable pupil outcomes identified for use by the charter school. “Pupil outcomes” for purposes of this paragraph means the extent to which all pupils of the school demonstrate they have attained the skills and knowledge specified as goals in the school’s educational program. “Pupil outcomes” shall include state assessments and standards;

The method by which pupil progress in meeting those pupil outcomes is to be measured;

The governance structure of the school, including but not limited to the process to be followed by the school to ensure parental, teacher and community involvement;

The qualifications to be met by individuals to be employed by the school;

The procedure that the school will follow to ensure the health and safety of pupils and staff;

Admission requirements, if applicable, provided that enrollment shall be open to all to the extent seats are available within the applicable grade level, subject to W.S. 21-3-304(c). If the number of applicants for enrollment exceeds the available seats, the charter school shall, subject to W.S. 21-3-304(c), hold a blind lottery to determine enrollment. Students enrolled in the previous year shall be guaranteed a seat, and applicants with a sibling enrolled in the charter school shall receive a preference;

The manner in which an annual audit of the financial and programmatic operations of the school, including any services provided by the authorizer, is to be conducted;

The procedure by which pupils can be suspended or expelled;

In accordance with this article, the manner by which staff members of the charter schools will be covered under the Wyoming retirement system and federal social security;

A description of the rights of any employee of the school district upon leaving the employment of the school district to work in a charter school and of any rights upon returning to the school district after employment at a charter school;

Minimum enrollment requirements;

Evidence of adequate community support;

Evidence that the plan for the charter school is economically sound;

A proposed budget for the term of the charter;

and (xvii) Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 169, § 4.

The employment policies of the proposed charter school;

An agreement between the parties regarding their respective legal liability and applicable insurance coverage;

A description of how the charter school plans to meet the transportation needs of its pupils and whether the charter school plans to provide transportation for pupils;

In accordance with this article, a description of the rights of any employee of the school district upon commencing employment in a charter school;

A financial feasibility statement providing evidence of charter school viability following the first three (3) years of charter school operation;

In the case of a proposed charter school that plans to establish a full-time virtual charter school, the application shall additionally require the applicant to provide a description regarding the methods by which the charter school will:

Ensure adequate supports are available to the students in their homes or regions, including parent teacher conferences and interactions;

Monitor student outcomes and administer state required assessments to all students in a proctored setting;

Establish and implement legally permissible criteria and processes for enrollment based on the existence of supports needed for student success;

Provide the desired enrollment level of the school for each year of the charter contract, not to exceed two hundred fifty (250) students in any given year, with any increases in enrollment from one (1) year to the next based on whether the school meets its performance requirements;

Provide a detailed budget for the school and propose a funding level per student for the school that is based upon that budget;

Provide data for oversight, funding, renewal and closure decisions for full-time virtual charter school specific goals regarding student enrollment, attendance, engagement, achievement, truancy and attrition that demonstrates the school meets agreed upon benchmarks;

Provide that no more than twenty percent (20%) of its enrollment shall be from outside of the school district where the charter school is located without prior approval of the state loan and investment board.

In the case of a proposed charter school that intends to contract with an education service provider for educational program implementation or comprehensive management, the application shall additionally require the applicant to:

Provide evidence of the education service provider’s success in serving student populations similar to the targeted population, including demonstrated academic achievement as well as successful management of nonacademic school functions, if applicable;

Provide a term sheet setting forth the proposed duration of the education service contract, the roles and responsibilities of the governing board, the school staff and the service provider, the scope of services and resources to be provided by the service provider, the performance evaluation measures and timelines for the service provider, the compensation structure for the service provider including clear identification of all fees to be paid to the education service provider, methods of contract oversight and enforcement, investment disclosures and conditions for renewal and termination of the contract; and

Disclose and explain any existing or potential conflicts of interest between the school governing board, the school’s leadership and management team and the proposed education service provider or any affiliated business entities.

In the case of a proposed charter public school from an applicant that currently operates one (1) or more additional schools inside or outside of Wyoming, the application shall additionally require the applicant to provide evidence of past performance and the capacity for the operation of the additional school.

Upon submission of an application under W.S. 21-3-307(a), the authorizer shall notify the applicant within thirty (30) days of submission whether the application is complete. If the authorizer determines that the application is incomplete, the authorizer shall advise the applicant of the reasons for the determination in sufficient detail for the applicant to make changes for resubmission of the application to the authorizer.

Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 169, § 4.

The state superintendent shall through rule and regulation prescribe a uniform charter school application and renewal application form to be used by each authorizer and charter school applicant for purposes of this article, and shall establish charter school application review procedures, including timelines for application components specified under subsection (a) of this section. The phased application process prescribed by state superintendent rule and regulation may provide a process for mediation of disputes concerning completeness of an application between the applicant and authorizer, which would be subject to W.S.

1-43-101

through

1-43-104

, would allow either party to initiate mediation and would impose costs of mediation equally upon both parties. Any mediation process prescribed by rule shall specify professional requirements for the impartial third party facilitating mediation. If either party refuses to mediate, the dispute may be appealed to the state board as provided in W.S.

21-3-310

.

The state loan and investment board shall submit all applications received under this section to the department of education for review of compliance with the accreditation requirements. The department of education shall submit a report of this review to the state loan and investment board.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 207, § 1; 2003, ch. 208, § 901; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2009, ch. 113, § 1; 2011, ch. 14, § 1; 2021 ch. 169, §§ 2, 4, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2006 amendment,

in (a), added “and” at the end of (xxi); and made a related change in (xx).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

The 2009 amendment,

added (b) through (d).

Laws 2009, ch. 113, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2009.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in the introductory paragraph of (a), inserted “shall be on a form prescribed by the state superintendent pursuant to subsection (d) of this section”; and in (d), inserted “prescribe a uniform charter school application and renewal application form to be used by each district and charter school applicant for purposes of this article, and shall.”

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 169, § 2, effective July 1, 2022, deleted "a proposed agreement, shall be" following "application shall be" in (a); rewrote (a)(vii), which read, "Admission requirements, if applicable"; substituted "authorizer" for "school district" in (a)(viii); rewrote, (a)(xiii), which read, "Evidence that an adequate number of parents, teachers, pupils or any combination thereof support the formation of a charter school"; deleted "for both the charter school and the school district" at the end of (a)(xiv); added (a)(xxiii) through (a)(xxv) and made related changes; in (b), substituted "authorizer" for "superintendent of the school district," in the second sentence, substituted "authorizer" for "district superintendent" twice, "authorizer" for " superintendent" preceding "shall advise"; in (d), substituted "authorizer" for "district" in the first sentence, "authorizer" for "school district" in the second sentence; and added (e).

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 169, § 4, effective July 1, 2022, repealed (a)(xvi), which read, "A plan for the displacement of pupils, teachers and other employees who will not attend or be employed in the charter school"; repealed (a)(xvii), which read, "An explanation of the relationship that will exist between the proposed charter school and its employees, including evidence that the terms and conditions of employment have been addressed with affected employees and their recognized representative, if any" and repealed (c), which read, "The district superintendent’s determination that an application is complete shall not prevent the district superintendent from making subsequent recommendations to, or from opposing the application before, the school board."

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2011, ch. 14, § 2 provides: “Rules and regulations of the state superintendent of public instruction establishing charter school application and renewal application forms pursuant to W.S. 21-3-307(d), as amended by section 1 of this act, shall be promulgated in sufficient time for use by school districts and charter school applicants on and after July 1, 2011.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 21-3-308.
Hearing by authorizer; prohibited actions by authorizer; criteria; compliance with state standards; contractual authority.

Not later than sixty (60) days after receiving an application for any charter school which has been determined to be complete pursuant to W.S.

21-3-307

(b), the authorizer shall hold a public hearing on the application, at which time the authorizer shall consider the level of community and parental support for the application if an application for a new charter school, or the level of teacher and parental support if an application for a converted charter school or charter school within a school. The application review process shall also include an in-person interview of the applicant or applicant group. Following review of the application and the public hearing, if applicable, and in accordance with subsection (d) of this section, the authorizer shall either approve or deny the application within ninety (90) days of receipt. In addition, the authorizer may approve an application for the operation of a converted charter school only if it determines teacher and parental support for the conversion are established at the levels required by W.S. 21-3-306(b). Prior to approving an application for a charter school under this section, the authorizer shall approve and adopt the content and terms of the charter as provided in W.S.

21-3-307

.

No district board of trustees or agent of the board shall require any employee of the school district to be employed in a charter school or any pupil enrolled in the school district to attend a charter school. No district board or its agent shall harass, threaten, discipline, discharge, retaliate or in any manner discriminate against any district employee involved directly or indirectly with an application to establish a charter school as authorized under this article.

The applicant shall provide with the application information regarding the proposed operation and potential effects of the school, including but not limited to the facilities to be utilized by the school, the manner in which administrative services of the school are to be provided and a demonstration that the school is adequately insured for liability, including errors and omissions coverage, and that the authorizer is indemnified to the fullest extent possible. A district board may upon request of the applicant and approval of the charter school application, make available for use by the charter school any district facility which is closed, not operational and otherwise feasible for use as an educational building as defined under W.S. 21-15-109(a)(ii).

Upon the approval of any application by the authorizer, the applicant shall provide written notice of that approval including a copy of the application to the state superintendent. If the authorizer denies the application, the authorizer shall not later than forty-five (45) days following the date of its decision, notify the applicant of the denial in writing together with its reasons for denial.

A charter school may contract for the provision of services and property subject to the following:

The contract shall be executed in the same manner and subject to the same restrictions as contracts by a school district;

The charter school shall be subject to all competitive bidding laws which apply to a school district;

The contract shall not exceed funds available to the charter school;

The contract shall not exceed the remaining length of operation for which the charter school was approved pursuant to W.S.

21-3-309

;

Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 169, § 4.

A school district shall not discriminate against a charter school in publicizing the district’s educational options through advertising, direct mail, availability of mailing lists or other informational activities.

Charter schools shall meet the state uniform educational program standards imposed upon public schools by W.S.

21-9-101

and

21-9-102

and the uniform state student content and performance standards prescribed by the state board of education under W.S.

21-2-304

, including compliance with requirements under the statewide assessment system pursuant to W.S.

21-2-304

(a)(v).

Those teachers employed on a full-time basis in the charter school system shall be subject to the same requirements with respect to certification by the Wyoming professional teaching standards board under W.S.

21-2-802

and other qualifications as any other teachers authorized to teach in Wyoming public schools.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 207, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 58, § 1; 2007, ch. 84, § 1; 2009, ch. 113, § 1; 2021 ch. 169, §§ 2, 4, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, inserted “and in accordance with subsection (d) of this section” near the middle of (a); and inserted “not later than forty-five (45) days following the date of its decision” in (d).

The 2009 amendment,

in (a), substituted “which has been determined to be complete pursuant to W.S. 21-3-307(b)” for “as defined in W.S.

21-3-302

” in the first sentence.

Laws 2009, ch. 113, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2009.

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 169, § 2, effective July 1, 2022, deleted "state board review;" in the section heading; in (a), substituted "authorizer" for "board" and variants throughout, added "state board review" in the section heading; substituted "sixty (60)" for "thirty (30)" in the first sentence, added the second sentence, substituted "ninety (90)" for "sixty (60)" in the third sentence, deleted the fourth sentence, which read, "Approval under this article may be conditioned for purposes specified under subsection (c) of this section," substituted "charter" for "contract" in the last sentence; in the first sentence of (c), substituted "The applicant shall" for "The district board shall require the applicant to," added "with the application," substituted "authorizer" for "school district," deleted the former second sentence, which read, "As authorized under subsection (a) of this section, the applicant may request the district board and the board may approve the charter application subject to specified conditions which provide the applicant sufficient time to acquire necessary funding for securing or otherwise finalizing arrangements for facilities or equipment necessary for the operation of the proposed school," substituted "A" for "In addition, the" at the beginning of the last sentence; substituted "authorizer" for "board" and variants throughout (d); and substituted "a" for "the" preceding "school district" in (e)(i) and (e)(ii).

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 169, § 4, effective July 1, 2022, repealed (e)(v), which read, "With the consent of the school district, the charter school may delegate the authority to negotiate the contract or execute the contract, or both, to the school district."

Cited

in

Laramie County Sch. Dist. #2 v. Albin Cats Charter Sch., Inc., 2005 WY 43,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 49

, 109 P.3d 552 (2005).

§ 21-3-309.
Length of operation under charter; renewal; revocation.

A charter contract may be granted pursuant to this article for a period of five (5) years. A charter contract may be renewed for successive five (5) year terms, provided that the authorizer may vary the duration of the term based on the performance, demonstrated capacities and particular circumstances of the charter school. An authorizer may grant renewal of the charter contract with specific conditions for necessary improvements to the charter school.

A charter school renewal application submitted to the authorizer shall be on a form prescribed by the state superintendent pursuant to W.S. 21-3-307(d) and in accordance with W.S. 21-3-305(b) and shall contain:

A report on the progress of the charter school in achieving the goals, objectives, pupil performance standards, content standards and other terms of the initial approved charter application; and

A financial statement that discloses the costs of administration, instruction and other spending categories for the charter school that is understandable to the general public and that will allow comparison of such costs to other schools or other comparable organizations, in a format required by the state board.

A charter may be revoked or not renewed by the authorizer if the authorizer determines that the charter school did any of the following:

Committed a material violation of any of the conditions, standards or procedures set forth in the charter application;

Failed to meet or make reasonable progress toward achievement of the content standards or pupil performance standards identified in the charter application;

Failed to meet generally accepted standards of fiscal management; or

Violated any provision of law from which the charter school was not specifically exempted.

Repealed by Laws 2021 ch. 169 § 4.

If an authorizer revokes or does not renew a charter, the authorizer shall state its reasons for the revocation or nonrenewal.

Repealed by Laws 2021 ch. 169 § 4.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 207, § 1; 2007, ch. 84, § 1; 2011, ch. 14, § 1; 2021 ch. 169, §§ 2, 4, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a), substituted “successive periods not to exceed five (5) years for each renewal period” for “a period not to exceed five (5) years.”

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in the introductory paragraph of (b), inserted “be on a form prescribed by the state superintendent pursuant to W.S. 21-3-307(d) and shall.”

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 169, § 2, effective July 1, 2022, rewrote (a), which read, "A charter may be granted pursuant to this article for a period not to exceed five (5) years and may be renewed for successive periods not to exceed five (5) years for each renewal period. A material revision of the provisions of a charter petition may be made only with the approval of the local board granting the charter"; in (b), substituted "authorizer" for "school district," added "and in accordance with W.S. 21-3-305(b)"; in (c), substituted "authorizer" for "school district," "authorizer" for "board"; and in (e), substituted "an authorizer" for "a district board" and "authorizer" for "board."

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 169, § 4, effective July 1, 2022, repealed (d), which read, "A charter shall not be renewed upon a determination by the district board that it is not in the interest of the pupils residing within the school district to continue the operation of the charter school"; and repealed (f), which read, "A decision to revoke or not to renew a charter may be appealed pursuant to the provisions of W.S.

21-3-310

."

§ 21-3-310.
Appeal; standard of review; procedures. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 207, § 1; 2007, ch. 84, § 1; repealed by 2021 ch. 169, § 4, effective July 1, 2022.

§ 21-3-311.
Participation in retirement system.

Repealed by Laws 2021 ch. 169, § 4.

Any charter school shall participate in the Wyoming retirement system to the extent as if it were a public school within the district as designated in the charter.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 207, § 1; 2021 ch. 169, §§ 2, 4, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 169, § 2, effective July 1, 2022, in the section heading, deleted "Compliance with charter;" and made a related change; and added "as designated in the charter" in (b).

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 169, § 4, effective July 1, 2022, repealed (a), which read, "A charter school approved pursuant to this article shall comply with the provisions set forth in its charter petition."

§ 21-3-312.
Authorizer to report to state board.

Each authorizer granting a charter pursuant to this article shall annually report to the state board on each charter school operating under its authorization and compliance with the provisions of the charter.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 207, § 1; 2021 ch. 169, § 2, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, substituted "Authorizer" for "District board" in the section heading; and rewrote the section, which read, "Each district board granting a charter pursuant to this article shall annually report to the state board on each charter school operating within the district, compliance with the provisions of the charter and shall assure the state board that students attending the charter school are receiving an education consistent with the educational opportunities available to all students within the school district."

§ 21-3-313.
Charter schools; employee options.

Repealed by Laws 2021 ch. 169, § 4.

The employment status of school district employees employed by the charter school who seek to return to employment with noncharter schools in the school district shall be negotiated with the school district and included in the charter contract.

Repealed by Laws 2021 ch. 169, § 4.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 207, § 1; 2015 ch. 177, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2021 ch. 169, §§ 2, 4, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015 added (c).

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 169, § 2, effective July 1, 2022, added "with the school district" in (b).

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 169, § 4, effective July 1, 2022, repealed (a), which read, "During the first year that a teacher employed by a school district is employed by a charter school, the teacher shall be considered to be on a one (1) year leave of absence from the school district. The leave of absence shall commence on the first day of services for the charter school. Upon the request of the teacher, the one (1) year leave of absence shall be renewed for up to two (2) additional one (1) year periods upon the mutual agreement of the teacher and the school district. At the end of three (3) years, the relationship between the teacher and the school district shall be determined by the school district and the district shall provide notice to the teacher of the relationship"; and repealed (c), which read, "Effective school year 2015-2016 and each school year thereafter, employees of a charter school shall, for purposes of this subsection, be included as payroll of the school district and shall be eligible to participate in any salary adjustment for school district employees which is funded by the legislature and is in addition to the foundation program amount computed under W.S. 21-13-309(p). Any amount computed and allocated pursuant to this subsection shall be used exclusively by the governing body of the charter school for charter school employee salary adjustments as determined by the governing body."

§ 21-3-314.
Students counted among district ADM; determination of charter school funding.

Each student attending a charter school shall be counted among the average daily membership of the school district in which the school is located and the school shall be included in the district’s configuration of schools reported to the state superintendent under W.S. 21-13-309(m)(iv). Average daily membership of the charter school shall be calculated as follows:

Notwithstanding W.S. 21-13-309(m)(iv)(A), in the first year of operation, the average daily membership for the charter school shall be based on the following:

Initial average daily membership shall be calculated based upon the March 1 list of students who intend to enroll in the charter school as required under subsection (b) of this section;

The average daily membership of the charter school computed under subparagraph (i)(A) of this subsection shall be adjusted by the enrollment count taken on October 1 of the first year of operation;

If the charter is initiated under W.S.

21-3-306

by any person other than the school district in which the charter is operating, the average daily membership computed under subparagraphs (i)(A) and (B) of this subsection shall be multiplied by two (2).

In the second year and all subsequent years and except as otherwise provided under paragraph (iv) of this subsection, the average daily membership of the charter school shall be counted only among the average daily membership of the school district;

For purposes of W.S. 21-13-309(m)(iv)(A), and upon charter school operation for three (3) consecutive school years, charter school average daily membership computed under paragraph (i) of this subsection shall, if the charter is subject to subparagraph (i)(C) of this subsection, be divided by two (2) prior to computing the school’s ADM averaged over the three (3) immediately preceding school years;

Notwithstanding W.S. 21-13-309(m)(iv)(A), in the second and third year of charter school operation, the average daily membership of a charter school shall be based upon the prior school year average daily membership adjusted by the enrollment count taken on October 1 of the applicable school year;

Notwithstanding W.S. 21-13-309(m)(iv)(A), for any charter school in its fourth or subsequent year of charter school operation and the charter school expands its enrollment to include one (1) or more consecutive grade levels above its current school configuration of grades, the average daily membership for the charter school shall be adjusted by the enrollment count taken on October 1 of the first year of operation under the expanded grade level or levels.

Any approved charter school shall provide the local school district with the names, grades and school of current enrollment for all students who plan to enroll in the proposed charter school. The information shall be provided no later than March 1 of the school year preceding the school year in which the charter school plans to begin operation.

As part of the charter school contract, the charter school and the school district shall agree on funding and any services to be provided by the school district to the charter school. The charter school and the school district shall begin discussions on the contract using the following revenue assumptions:

The charter school shall be entitled to the benefit of one hundred percent (100%) of the foundation program amount computed under W.S. 21-13-309(m) based upon the average daily membership of the charter school, less any district level amounts generated by the charter school’s membership under W.S. 21-13-309(m) and less amounts specified under W.S. 21-13-309(m)(v)(E).

and (B) Repealed by Laws 2006, ch. 37, § 2.

The charter school shall be entitled to the benefit of one hundred percent (100%) of the amount to be contributed to the school district under major maintenance payments pursuant to W.S.

21-15-109

based upon the proportion that the charter school educational building gross square footage contributes to the district educational building gross square footage;

The charter school shall be entitled to the benefit of one hundred percent (100%) of the amount generated by the payroll of its employees in allocating any school district salary adjustment pursuant to W.S. 21-3-313(c).

The charter school may also contract with the school district for centralized services provided by the district including curriculum, media services, libraries and federally required educational services such as special education.

In lieu of paragraph (a)(iv) and subsections (c) and (d) of this section, the district and the charter school applicant may by mutual agreement fund the charter school through a specific budget for the charter school.

If a charter school or full-time virtual charter school authorized by the state loan and investment board and the school district where the charter school is located do not agree on funding pursuant to subsections (a) through (e) of this section then, notwithstanding subsection (c) of this section or any other provision of law funding for the charter school shall be calculated as provided in this subsection. Nothing in this subsection shall be deemed to prohibit a charter school and the school district from negotiating an agreement for charter school students to receive services from the district. Funding for the charter school shall be calculated as follows:

All funding for the school district under W.S. 21-13-309(m) that is attributable to the charter school shall be reduced to eighty percent (80%) of the amount that would otherwise have been calculated;

All funding for the school district under W.S. 21-13-309(m) that is attributable to the full-time virtual charter school shall be reduced to sixty-five percent (65%) of the amount that would otherwise have been calculated;

The charter school shall be entitled to funding as provided in subsection (c) of this section from the reduced amount calculated under paragraph (i) or (ii) of this subsection.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 207, § 1; 2003, ch. 208, § 901; 2004, ch. 108, § 901; 2006, ch. 37, §§ 1, 2; 2009, ch. 113, § 1; 2012, ch. 86, § 1; 2013 ch. 1, § 2, effective January 29, 2013; 2015 ch. 30, § 1, effective February 25, 2015; 2015 ch. 177, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2021 ch. 169, § 2, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (c)(i), substituted “foundation program amount computed under W.S. 21-13-309(p) based upon” for “amount computed under the appropriate prototypical school model level specified under W.S. 21-13-309(m)(ii) for”; in (d), deleted the existing first sentence, which formerly read: “In addition to subsection (c) of this section, the charter school, at its discretion, may negotiate with the school district for funding under the adjustments to the appropriate prototypical school model levels under W.S. 21-13-309(n),” and deleted “custodial services, routine maintenance” preceding “curriculum.”

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, rewrote (a); in (c)(i), substituted “one hundred percent (100%)” for “ninety-five percent (95%),” “21-13-309(m)” for “21-13-309(p),” added the language beginning, “any district level” at the end, and repealed former (c)(i)(A) and (B), pertaining to the monetary reduction of the per average daily membership for the transportation and special education adjustments.

The 2009 amendment,

in (a)(i) deleted “multiplied by two (2)” preceding “based on the following” at the end of the introductory language; added (a)(i)(C); and inserted “if the charter is subject to subparagraph (i)(C) of this subsection,” in (a)(iii).

Laws 2009, ch. 113, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2009.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, added (a)(v).

The 2013 amendment,

in (a) added the first sentence, and substituted “director” for “state superintendent” near the end of the second sentence.

Laws 2013, ch. 1, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved January 29, 2013.

The 2015 amendments. —

The first 2015 amendment, by ch. 30, § 1, in the introductory language of (a), deleted the former first sentence, which read: “The director of the state department of education shall administer the education resource block grant model and perform the duties prescribed under this statute,” and substituted “state superintendent” for “director” in the present first sentence.

Laws 2015, ch. 30, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

The second 2015 amendment, by ch. 177, § 1, effective July 1, 2015, in (c) added (iii).

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2022, added (f).

2013 amendment unconstitutional. —

Senate Enrolled Act 1 (Laws 2013, Chapter 1), which amended this section, is unconstitutional, as it deprives the State Superintendent of Public Instruction the power of ?general supervision of the public schools? that is entrusted to the Superintendent in
Wyo. Const. art. 7, ? 14.
Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15, 318 P.3d 300,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 2014), and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014).